Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2897.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; department of administration; classroom construction; Kin Dah Lichii Community The sum of $1,800,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the department of administration for construction of a three thousand square foot, one classroom building within the Kin Dah Lichii Community.